Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202057-706
Tax; security;
notice; use.

The Tax Commissioner, whenever he or she deems it necessary
to insure compliance with the provisions of sections 57-701 to 57-719, may require any person subject to the
tax to deposit with the Tax Commissioner suitable indemnity bond to insure
payment of the taxes, levied under the provisions of sections 57-701 to 57-719, as the Tax Commissioner may determine.
Such security may be used if it becomes necessary to collect any tax, interest,
or penalty due. Notice of the use thereof shall be given to such person by mail.

Laws 1955, c. 219, § 6, p. 612;

Laws 1957, c. 242, § 48, p. 860;

Laws 1967, c. 351, § 4, p. 934;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 14.